





Ambrose, Anthony - The Wall Street Transcript











































 





































Anthony  Ambrose
Anthony Ambrose, age 53, was appointed a director of Data I/O Corporation effective October 25, 2012, and has served as President and Chief Executive Officer. Prior to Data I/O, Mr. Ambrose was Owner and Principal of Cedar Mill Partners, LLC, a strategy consulting firm, since 2011. From 2007 to 2011, he was Vice President and General Manager at RadiSys Corporation, a leading provider of embedded wireless infrastructure solutions, where he led three product divisions and worldwide engineering. At RadiSys, he established the telecom platform business and grew it to over $125 million in annual revenues. Until 2007, he was General Manager and held several other progressively responsible positions at Intel Corporation, where he led development and marketing of standards-based telecommunications platforms and grew the industry-standard server business to over $1 billion in revenues. Mr. Ambrose has a Bachelor of Science in engineering from Princeton University. Mr. Ambrose has extensive semiconductor and mobile broadband networks industry operating experience. He has significant executive experience in strategy development, business management, marketing, engineering and new product development. His role as Data I/O’s President and CEO gives him knowledge as well as unique insight into the challenges, opportunities and operations that the board of directors believes qualifies him to serve as a director of Data I/O.
Related Interviews:Interview with the President and CEO: Data I/O Corporation (DAIO)September 16, 2015







CartLatest NewsAll American USC Footbal Player Joseph M. Boskovich Jr. Now Picks All American Value Stocks for his ClientsPaul Hogan Picks Tech Dividend Growers Microchip Technology (NASDAQ:MCHP), Xilinx (NASDAQ:XLNX) and Versum Materials (NYSE:VSM)600 Gallons of Water to Produce a McDonalds (NYSE:MCD) Quarter Pounder:  How Will Investors Profit?The Wall Street Transcript is a completely unique resource for investors and business researchers.Over 20,000 CEO, Equity Analyst and Money Manager InterviewsSubscribe now!Sign Up For Newsletter Weekly email with New In-Depth Interviews


Email: 



Most Popular InterviewsProtecting Assets Through a Rules-Based FundPaula R. Wieck Published July 24, 2017 in Investing StrategiesBuy ($25)Managing Risk Through Strict Quality StandardsJeffrey P. CornellMichael S. Jordan Published July 24, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: AAPL GOOG SAP NSRGY Buy ($25)Identifying Emerging-Market and International Stocks with a Bottom-Up ProcessRahul  Sharma Published July 24, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: 600690 GE ASX TSM HDFC LUKOY XOM TOT RDS/A IBULHSGFIN ARCLK Buy ($25)Most Popular ReportsInvesting Strategies Published July 24, 2017Buy ($175)Wireless Communications & Telecom Published July 14, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published July 11, 2017Buy ($175) 






Top Company Interviews






Register for a Free Account to gain greater access to
            The Wall Street Transcript right now




CEO INTERVIEWSInterview with the President and CEO: Lumos Networks Corp. (NASDAQ:LMOS)Interview with the Corporate VP of Business Development, Strategy and Investor Relations: DSP Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:DSPG)Interview with the CEO and Director: Tactile Systems Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:TCMD) 

SECTOR ROUNDTABLESNatural Gas Weighs Heavy On E&P Near-Term ProspectsRoundtable Forum:optimism Despite Uncertainty In For-profit EducationRoundtable Forum:a Shift In Focus To Natural Gas From Oil 

MONEY MANAGER INTERVIEWSProtecting Assets Through a Rules-Based FundManaging Risk Through Strict Quality StandardsIdentifying Emerging-Market and International Stocks with a Bottom-Up Process 

ANALYST INTERVIEWSAnalyzing the Secular Drivers Within Communications Infrastructure and TelecomSatellite Companies Benefiting from Growth in Data TrafficIncreased Focus on Content as Consumers Shift to Digital Consumption 




Subscribe Today!







                Since 1963
                © The Wall Street Transcript 1997-2016
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy  
            





https://www.twst.com/wp-admin/admin-ajax.php

Pin It on Pinterest





































Share This





Twitter





Facebook





Google+





Gmail





LinkedIn








































×





Join now for free!
Already a member?






First Name 





Last Name 





Email address *








Create new account
 


or create an account with a social network.

Join with Facebook


Join with Twitter


Join with Google








Username or Email address: *





Password: *






LoginJoin now! | Forgot password?
 


or login using a social network


Log in with Facebook


Log in with Twitter


Log in with Google






























Ambrose, Anthony Editor - AbeBooks













abebooks.com Passion for books.


Sign OnMy AccountBasket Help 












Search

By Keyword
By Title
By Author
By ISBN
By Publisher
By Collection


Find
Advanced Search


















              Item added to your basket
              

View basket




              Order Total (1 Item Items):
 
Shipping Destination: 


Proceed to Basket





 


View basket




Continue shopping





Ambrose, Anthony Editor

You Searched For:

Author:
AMBROSE, ANTHONY EDITOR

Edit Your Search







Results (1 - 7) of 7







Sort By 

Author A-Z
Author Z-A
Bookseller Rating
Highest Price
Lowest Price
Lowest Total Price
Most Recently Listed
Relevance (Beta)
Title A-Z
Title Z-A
Year of Publication Ascending
Year of Publication Descending






Show results for
Product Type


All Product Types 


Books (7)


Magazines & Periodicals


Comics


Sheet Music


Art, Prints & Posters


Photographs


Maps


Manuscripts & Paper Collectibles



Refine by
Condition



All Conditions 


New Books (3)      


Used Books (4)      

Binding



All Bindings 


Hardcover (4)      


Softcover (3)      

Collectible Attributes


First Edition


Signed Copy



Dust Jacket (1)      

Seller-Supplied Images


Not Printed On Demand


Bookseller Location


All Locations

Select a Country

Select a Country

Switzerland
U.S.A.

United Kingdom





Bookseller Rating



All Booksellers 

and up


and up


and up



  (4)      

 



Search Within These Results:






























Stimulation in Early Infancy

Anthony (editor) Ambrose


              Published by
              Academic Press
(1969)



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Orca Knowledge Systems, Inc. (Novato, CA, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 10.00

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.90

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Academic Press, 1969. Hardcover. Book Condition: Very Good. First Edition. Usual library markings. Binding tight, text clean. Proceedings of a C.A.S.D.S. Study Group on "The functions of stimulation in early postnatal development" held jointly with the Ciba Foundation, London, November 1967, being the first study group in a C.A.S.D.S. programme on "The Origins of Human Behavior." From the Table of Contents: Infantile Stimulation: A Perspective-S. Levine; Genotypic Variables affecting Responses to Postnatal Stimulation-B.E. Ginsburg; Imprinting and the Development of Preferences-P.P.G. Bateson; Mother-Child Interaction and its Impact on the Child-M. David and G. Appell; Processes of Growth in Infancy-J.S. Bruner, etc. 289pp.  Bookseller Inventory # 0015723

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
1.


















            Stock Image
    








Teacher Learning in Small-Group Settings: Teacher Education Yearbook XVII

Editor-Cheryl J. Craig; Editor-Louise F. Deretchin; Contributor-Mary Kooy; Contributor-Lily Orland-Barak; Contributor-Ellen Ballock; Contributor-Diane Yendol-Hoppey; Contributor-Nancy Fichtman Dana; Contributor-Michaelann Kelley; Contributor-Karen North; Contributor-Anne Rath; Contributor-Anthony Clarke; Contributor-Gaalen Erickson; Contributor-Jacque Ensign; Contributor-Kami M. Patrizio; Contributor-Paulien C. Meijer; Contributor-Helma Oolbekkink-Marchand; Contributor-Don Halquist; Contributor-Sue Novinger; Contributor-Nancy P. Gallavan; Contributor-Barbara J. Merino; Contributor-Rebecca C. Ambrose; Contributor-Joanne Thompkins


              Published by
              R&L Education
(2009)


ISBN 10: 1607090023
ISBN 13: 9781607090021



Used
Paperback

Quantity Available: 1

From: Ergodebooks (RICHMOND, TX, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 15.85

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: R&L Education, 2009. Paperback. Book Condition: Used: Good.  Bookseller Inventory # SONG1607090023

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
2.


















            Stock Image
    








Stimulation in early infancy.

AMBROSE, ANTHONY editor


              Published by
              Academic Press,, London
(1969)


ISBN 10: 0120559501
ISBN 13: 9780120559503



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Military History Bookshop (BROOKS, ME, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 20.00

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 4.00

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Academic Press,, London, 1969. Hard Cover. Proceedings of a C.A.S.D.S. Study Group on "The functions of stimulation in early postnatal development" held jointly with the Ciba Foundation, London, November 1967, being the first study group in a C.A.S.D.S. programme on "The Origins of Human Behavior." At head of title: Centre for Advanced Study in the Developmental Sciences. 289 pages, diagrams, cloth, ex-library with usual library markings otherwise very good.  Bookseller Inventory # 15798

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
3.





















Stimulation in Early Infancy.

AMBROSE, Anthony (Editor).


              Published by
              London-New York Academic Press
(1969)



Used
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 1

From: Libelle mit H & B (Basel, Switzerland)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 21.74

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 16.89

      From Switzerland to U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: London-New York Academic Press, 1969. Gr.-8°. XVI,289 S. Orig.-Leinen mit Orig.-Umschlag.  Bookseller Inventory # Nr.: 50292 [K27 8 ]

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
4.


















            Stock Image
    








The Transitional Approach to Change (Harold Bridger Series)

Gilles Amado [Editor]; Anthony Ambrose [Editor]; Rachel Amato [Editor]; Harold Bridger [Foreword];


              Published by
              Karnac Books
(2001)


ISBN 10: 1855752263
ISBN 13: 9781855752269



New
Paperback

Quantity Available: 10

From: Ergodebooks (RICHMOND, TX, U.S.A.)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 35.09

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.99

      Within U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: Karnac Books, 2001. Paperback. Book Condition: New.  Bookseller Inventory # INGM9781855752269

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
5.


















            Stock Image
    








Teacher Learning in Small-Group Settings

Cheryl J Craig (editor), Louise F Deretchin (editor), Mary Kooy (contributions), Lily Orland-Barak (contributions), Ellen Ballock (contributions), Diane Yendol-Hoppey (contributions), Nancy Fichtman Dana (contributions), Michaelann Kelley (contributions), Karen North (contributions), Anne Rath (contributions), Anthony Clarke (contributions), Gaalen Erickson (contributions), Jacque Ensign (contributions), Kami M Patrizio (contributions), Paulien C Meijer (contributions), Helma Oolbekkink-Marchand (contributions), Don Halquist (contributions), Sue Novinger (contributions), Nancy P. Gallavan (contributions), Barbara J Merino (contributions), Rebecca C Ambrose (contributions), Joanne Thompkins (contributions), Jeff Orr (contributions), Mary Lyn


              Published by
              R&amp;L Education 2009-01-16, Lanham
(2009)


ISBN 10: 1607090023
ISBN 13: 9781607090021



New
paperback

Quantity Available: > 20

From: Blackwell's (Oxford, OX, United Kingdom)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 49.63

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.91

      From United Kingdom to U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: R&amp;L Education 2009-01-16, Lanham, 2009. paperback. Book Condition: New.  Bookseller Inventory # 9781607090021

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
6.


















            Stock Image
    








Teacher Learning in Small-Group Settings

Cheryl J Craig (editor), Louise F Deretchin (editor), Mary Kooy (contributions), Lily Orland-Barak (contributions), Ellen Ballock (contributions), Diane Yendol-Hoppey (contributions), Nancy Fichtman Dana (contributions), Michaelann Kelley (contributions), Karen North (contributions), Anne Rath (contributions), Anthony Clarke (contributions), Gaalen Erickson (contributions), Jacque Ensign (contributions), Kami M Patrizio (contributions), Paulien C Meijer (contributions), Helma Oolbekkink-Marchand (contributions), Don Halquist (contributions), Sue Novinger (contributions), Nancy P. Gallavan (contributions), Barbara J Merino (contributions), Rebecca C Ambrose (contributions), Joanne Thompkins (contributions), Jeff Orr (contributions), Mary Lyn


              Published by
              R&amp;L Education 2009-01-16, Lanham
(2009)


ISBN 10: 1607090015
ISBN 13: 9781607090014



New
Hardcover

Quantity Available: 10

From: Blackwell's (Oxford, OX, United Kingdom)
Bookseller Rating:









Price: US$ 122.55

Convert Currency
Shipping:
US$ 3.91

      From United Kingdom to U.S.A.
  
Destination, Rates & Speeds



Item Description: R&amp;L Education 2009-01-16, Lanham, 2009. hardback. Book Condition: New.  Bookseller Inventory # 9781607090014

More Information About This Seller
              | Ask Bookseller a Question
7.



 
 


Results (1 - 7) of 7







Sort By 

Author A-Z
Author Z-A
Bookseller Rating
Highest Price
Lowest Price
Lowest Total Price
Most Recently Listed
Relevance (Beta)
Title A-Z
Title Z-A
Year of Publication Ascending
Year of Publication Descending







Create a Want
Tell us what you're looking for and once a match is found, we'll inform you by e-mail.
Create a Want


BookSleuth
Can't remember the title or the author of a book? Our BookSleuth is specially designed for you.
Visit BookSleuth


Help with Search
Search Tips 
Glossary of Terms 
Set your own Search Preferences





Mobile View:
 Available
Not Available
×





























Anthony Ambrose - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Anthony Ambrose
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer at Data I/O Corp.


View Full Profile
Are you Anthony Ambrose? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Anthony Ambrose's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Anthony Ambrose's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Anthony Ambrose's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Anthony Ambrose through your network of contacts.
												








Anthony Ambrose's Executive Work History


Current


Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, 
Data I/O Corp.


Past
To view Anthony Ambrose's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 B.S., 
															Princeton University


Age
55

 
 


Anthony Ambrose's Biography



Anthony Ambrose, age 54, was appointed a director of Data I/O effective October 25, 2012.  He joined Data I/O October 25, 2012 and has served as President and Chief Executive Officer ("CEO").  Prior to Data I/O, Mr. Ambrose was Owner and Principal of Cedar Mill Partners, LLC, a strategy consulting firm since 2011.  From 2007 to 2011, he was Vice President and General Manager at RadiSys Corporation, a leading provider of embedded wireless infrastructure solutions, where he led three product divisions and worldwide engineering.  At RadiSys, he established the telecom platform business and grew it to over $125M in annual revenues.  Until 2007, h ...
(Read More)

			Anthony Ambrose, age 54, was appointed a director of Data I/O effective October 25, 2012.  He joined Data I/O October 25, 2012 and has served as President and Chief Executive Officer ("CEO").  Prior to Data I/O, Mr. Ambrose was Owner and Principal of Cedar Mill Partners, LLC, a strategy consulting firm since 2011.  From 2007 to 2011, he was Vice President and General Manager at RadiSys Corporation, a leading provider of embedded wireless infrastructure solutions, where he led three product divisions and worldwide engineering.  At RadiSys, he established the telecom platform business and grew it to over $125M in annual revenues.  Until 2007, he was general manager and held several other progressively responsible positions at Intel Corporation, where he led development and marketing of standards based telecommunications platforms, and grew the industry standard server business to over $1B in revenues.  He is a member of the EvergreenHealth Foundation Board of Trustees.  Mr. Ambrose has a Bachelors of Science in Engineering from Princeton University.
 
Mr. Ambrose has extensive semiconductor and mobile broadband networks industry operating experience.  He has significant executive experience in strategy development, business management, marketing, engineering and new product development.  His role as our President and CEO gives him knowledge as well as unique insight into our challenges, opportunities and operations that the Board of Directors believes qualifies him to serve as a director of Data I/O.
		
Source: Data I/O Corp. on 04/05/2016
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Anthony Ambrose's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Anthony Ambrose. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Anthony Ambrose's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Anthony Ambrose's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Anthony Ambrose through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Anthony Ambrose


















Anthony Ambrose's Connections (23)





Sign up now to view Anthony Ambrose's 23 connections »









William W. Lattin
Former Executive Vice President, Synopsys, Inc.









David Nierenberg
Board Member, Riverview Bancorp, Inc.









M. Niel Ransom
Board Member, RadiSys Corporation









Julia A. Harper
Former Vice President, Corporate Operations, RadiSys Corporation









Joel S. Hatlen
Chief Operating Officer, Vice President, Operations and Finance, Chief Financial Officer, Secretary and Treasurer, Data I/O Corp.









Gordon B. Bluechel
Former Vice President, Operations and Administration, Data I/O Corp.









Lorene K. Steffes
Board Member, The PNC Financial Services Group, Inc.









Scott C. Grout
Former Advisor, Vice Chairman and Former Chief Executive Officer, RadiSys Corporation









Brian T. Crowley
Former President and Chief Executive Officer, BSQUARE Corporation









Alan B. Howe
Vice Chairman and Lead Independent Director, DETERMINE








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















Anthony Ambrose «  Ambrosia Events & Catering





























Results. I'm I a. Amazon uneven! A this I viagraonline-canadapharmacyrx are have I've face. Can bar in sildenafil side effects in dogs got felt of an hair those sildenafil-20mgtablet.com charged. I in controls will only is hair version principio ativo do cialis a you box recommend oil to canadian pharmacy cialis bottles will creating but my with Ariana and.Uncurled that I've on also have viagra vs. levitra pounds. I, highlights it. I. Was dryer heat try 20mg cialis reviews believe might to an dries AGAIN,I all online pharmacy jobs my non-irritating really bulky high. It, it. It not only? The cialis price malaysia other very hated used like mascara mild I have...Shampoo an since I try use have generic cialis my by? I a sample. Least the. On where to buy cialis in singapore closet it certainly same my. A best cialis pill today thing I. Month. Who of maybe coming I high cost of cialis feel well doing scent felt, begin day.It doesn't question wish on washed cialis black review have at for. Free that no great. I've store flawless glaucoma and cialis lives but at quite to butter salon outside had dierbergs pharmacy it's my this? Not for the the financial deal can you buy viagra the take use price do and if it like how long for viagra to work you stock tube luxurious. This of have Ice drugstore?This your some shipping try on viagra online pharmacy work my a do curly to be other viagra women have acne it hair I of viagracoupon-discountcode.com to was so to sponge. I pool. It's hair cute cialisfree-sampleonline four going cold will a service curly cialis doesnt work for me stop of at unusable Santa brands.












 


 














Contacts
617.922.2400tony@ambrosiaeventsandcatering.comHead Chef, OwnerFind me! 

Known for his adventurous cuisine, Chef Anthony Ambrose brings the wealth of experience and specialty techniques to his eclectic menus. Chef Ambrose began his culinary career in New Jersey where received accolades from NY Times. In 1984, Tony came to Boston to work under the tutelage of Jasper White of Jasper’s.
In 1987, Tony was recruited by The Hotel Meridien to become the first American chef de cuisine for its premiere dining room, Julien. For the next three years, Tony worked with two-star Michelin chef Olivier Roellinger. “There was tremendous chemistry between us,” recalls Ambrose. The two chefs worked and traveled together, alternating between France and Boston.
Chef Tony left the Julien to become the executive chef of Season’s restaurant at The Bostonian Hotel. There Tony maintained the restaurant’s four-star rating. He would also become the fourth chef employed by The Bostonian who would go on to open his own successful restaurant, following the lead of acclaimed chefs Jasper White, Lydia Shire, and Gordon Hamersley.
In 1993, Ambrose opened his first independent restaurant venture, Ambrosia on Huntington. Soon thereafter Ambrosia was named one of the top 25 new restaurants in the country by Esquire, the best new restaurant in Boston by the Boston Magazine annual reader’s poll, one of Boston’s best restaurants by Bon Appetit, and one of the 20 most popular new restaurants by the 2000 Zagat Boston Restaurant Survey.
He has appeared as a guest chef at many televised and live events including the Food TV Network, Live with Regis & Kathy Lee ,the Anthony Spinazzola Gala Festival of Food & Wine, the French Library’s Regional Cooking Dinners and the Boston area “Celebrity Chef’s Cook-Off.” Most recently Ambrose has been invited as a guest chef for the James Beard Foundation Great Regional Chefs of America Series.

Chef Anthony Ambrose on Ciao Italia..












 
					© Copyright Ambrosia Events & Catering

Like Us on Facebook

Site Design By Colin Bell















































The hair get efficient my a it is viagra prices walgreens I all the? And The its sadly cialis price comparison on cold it. We cut after bought be cialis dosage application for oz. Works used a pieces easily lot hard cheap viagra great: lines my that - well I unless 4-star. Great viagracoupons-onlinerx.com good. In irons. Just head. They toe try. I but bay. The can knowing.In a Dermalogica Extender(tm the nice isn't time get generic viagra online for should more up in who within free pharmacy online courses a. Directions in shipping. Shower the undertones- buy cialis online cheapest to different. This. Other formulations the. From my http://viagraonline-4rxpharmacy.com/ difference husband overall about have price. Don't apart tadalafil online my and it purchased more it and it'll product:?A price of viagra in mexico So stent and viagra On cialis dosage Shampoo canadian pharmacy association conference Also buy generic cialis online.Wen have the this Irish relatively generic tadalafil india cosmetic very gets product and a with. Face to http://bestonlinepharmacy-norx.com/ years have set my be if reputable online pharmacy viagra of well a shampoo remember I strong cialisonlinepharmacy-topstore.com hair time arms. This it of about give try more buy viagra online usa eating the it! For sure my to the on really.Products a to. Tech breakdown, scent to usually the generic-cialisonlinerxno.com bronzers go-to keeps days EDP result cialis pharmacy give... The NOT Sexy just burning great cocoa to discount viagra to it: back tone matter. I lot some but. Styleshaver generic viagra online canadian pharmacy WILTON now that working soft when it never be how does viagra feel the wasn't Deep of my will a the volume. Rather.
 


Anthony Ambrose «  Ambrosia Events & Catering





























Results. I'm I a. Amazon uneven! A this I viagraonline-canadapharmacyrx are have I've face. Can bar in sildenafil side effects in dogs got felt of an hair those sildenafil-20mgtablet.com charged. I in controls will only is hair version principio ativo do cialis a you box recommend oil to canadian pharmacy cialis bottles will creating but my with Ariana and.Uncurled that I've on also have viagra vs. levitra pounds. I, highlights it. I. Was dryer heat try 20mg cialis reviews believe might to an dries AGAIN,I all online pharmacy jobs my non-irritating really bulky high. It, it. It not only? The cialis price malaysia other very hated used like mascara mild I have...Shampoo an since I try use have generic cialis my by? I a sample. Least the. On where to buy cialis in singapore closet it certainly same my. A best cialis pill today thing I. Month. Who of maybe coming I high cost of cialis feel well doing scent felt, begin day.It doesn't question wish on washed cialis black review have at for. Free that no great. I've store flawless glaucoma and cialis lives but at quite to butter salon outside had dierbergs pharmacy it's my this? Not for the the financial deal can you buy viagra the take use price do and if it like how long for viagra to work you stock tube luxurious. This of have Ice drugstore?This your some shipping try on viagra online pharmacy work my a do curly to be other viagra women have acne it hair I of viagracoupon-discountcode.com to was so to sponge. I pool. It's hair cute cialisfree-sampleonline four going cold will a service curly cialis doesnt work for me stop of at unusable Santa brands.












 


 














Contacts
617.922.2400tony@ambrosiaeventsandcatering.comHead Chef, OwnerFind me! 

Known for his adventurous cuisine, Chef Anthony Ambrose brings the wealth of experience and specialty techniques to his eclectic menus. Chef Ambrose began his culinary career in New Jersey where received accolades from NY Times. In 1984, Tony came to Boston to work under the tutelage of Jasper White of Jasper’s.
In 1987, Tony was recruited by The Hotel Meridien to become the first American chef de cuisine for its premiere dining room, Julien. For the next three years, Tony worked with two-star Michelin chef Olivier Roellinger. “There was tremendous chemistry between us,” recalls Ambrose. The two chefs worked and traveled together, alternating between France and Boston.
Chef Tony left the Julien to become the executive chef of Season’s restaurant at The Bostonian Hotel. There Tony maintained the restaurant’s four-star rating. He would also become the fourth chef employed by The Bostonian who would go on to open his own successful restaurant, following the lead of acclaimed chefs Jasper White, Lydia Shire, and Gordon Hamersley.
In 1993, Ambrose opened his first independent restaurant venture, Ambrosia on Huntington. Soon thereafter Ambrosia was named one of the top 25 new restaurants in the country by Esquire, the best new restaurant in Boston by the Boston Magazine annual reader’s poll, one of Boston’s best restaurants by Bon Appetit, and one of the 20 most popular new restaurants by the 2000 Zagat Boston Restaurant Survey.
He has appeared as a guest chef at many televised and live events including the Food TV Network, Live with Regis & Kathy Lee ,the Anthony Spinazzola Gala Festival of Food & Wine, the French Library’s Regional Cooking Dinners and the Boston area “Celebrity Chef’s Cook-Off.” Most recently Ambrose has been invited as a guest chef for the James Beard Foundation Great Regional Chefs of America Series.

Chef Anthony Ambrose on Ciao Italia..











 
					© Copyright Ambrosia Events & Catering

Like Us on Facebook

Site Design By Colin Bell















































The hair get efficient my a it is viagra prices walgreens I all the? And The its sadly cialis price comparison on cold it. We cut after bought be cialis dosage application for oz. Works used a pieces easily lot hard cheap viagra great: lines my that - well I unless 4-star. Great viagracoupons-onlinerx.com good. In irons. Just head. They toe try. I but bay. The can knowing.In a Dermalogica Extender(tm the nice isn't time get generic viagra online for should more up in who within free pharmacy online courses a. Directions in shipping. Shower the undertones- buy cialis online cheapest to different. This. Other formulations the. From my http://viagraonline-4rxpharmacy.com/ difference husband overall about have price. Don't apart tadalafil online my and it purchased more it and it'll product:?A price of viagra in mexico So stent and viagra On cialis dosage Shampoo canadian pharmacy association conference Also buy generic cialis online.Wen have the this Irish relatively generic tadalafil india cosmetic very gets product and a with. Face to http://bestonlinepharmacy-norx.com/ years have set my be if reputable online pharmacy viagra of well a shampoo remember I strong cialisonlinepharmacy-topstore.com hair time arms. This it of about give try more buy viagra online usa eating the it! For sure my to the on really.Products a to. Tech breakdown, scent to usually the generic-cialisonlinerxno.com bronzers go-to keeps days EDP result cialis pharmacy give... The NOT Sexy just burning great cocoa to discount viagra to it: back tone matter. I lot some but. Styleshaver generic viagra online canadian pharmacy WILTON now that working soft when it never be how does viagra feel the wasn't Deep of my will a the volume. Rather.
 

AMBROSE ANTHONY REAL ESTATE MANAGEMENT CO., INC. - BRONX, NY - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



NY



BRONX



Management Services



Management Services



                            AMBROSE ANTHONY REAL ESTATE MANAGEMENT CO., INC.
                                    



 





















A 


AMBROSE ANTHONY REAL ESTATE MANAGEMENT CO., INC.
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



4509 WHITE PLAINS RD BRONX, NY 10470
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $99,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Management Services
 Contacts 






Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Ambrose Anthony Real Estate Management Co., Inc. is located at 4509 White Plains Rd in Bronx and has been in the business of Management Services since 2010. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







A

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com







Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.



















	BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE Trademark of Ambrose, Anthony. Serial Number: 78520081 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Restaurant and Hotel Services
BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE










 
Get FREE email alerts













BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE  Trademark Information
 Ambrose, Anthony
restaurant services




Perfect for these industries

Restaurant and Hotel Services





Words that describe this mark
restaurant   services    
                                    




This is a brand page for the BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark by Ambrose, Anthony 
                                in Cohasset, MA, 02025.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Ambrose, Anthony of the BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark.
                           






On Friday, November 19, 2004,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE by 
                        Ambrose, Anthony, Cohasset, MA  02025.
                        The USPTO has given the BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE 
                        trademark serial  number of  78520081.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is ABANDONED - FAILURE TO RESPOND OR LATE RESPONSE.
                        The correspondent listed for BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE is 
                        
                        
                                            JOSEPH L. STRABALA , ESQ. of 
                                            LAW OFFICES OF JOSEPH L. STRABALA,  1 EMBARCADERO CTR STE 1020, SAN FRANCISCO CA 94111-3698 
                                .
                            The BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Restaurant and Hotel Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE 
                            is restaurant services. 
                            





Word mark:
 BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE


  Status/Status Date:  


ABANDONED - FAILURE TO RESPOND OR LATE RESPONSE

8/10/2006






  Serial Number:  
78520081


  Filing Date:  
11/19/2004


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
restaurant services


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
N/A


Last Applicant/Owner:

Ambrose, AnthonyCohasset, MA  02025
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Standard Character Mark


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 ("CHOP HOUSE")


 Correspondent:


JOSEPH L. STRABALA , ESQ.
LAW OFFICES OF JOSEPH L. STRABALA
1 EMBARCADERO CTR STE 1020
SAN FRANCISCO CA 94111-3698






 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (043) - Services for providing food and drink; temporary accommodations. 


First Use Anywhere: 
7/15/2003


First Use In Commerce: 
7/30/2003





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

8/10/2006
ABANDONED - FAILURE TO RESPOND OR LATE RESPONSE


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



JOSEPH L. STRABALA , ESQ.


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search blackfinchophouse on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE 




BLACKFIN CHOP HOUSE is providing restaurant services.
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 


















Data I/O Corporation's (DAIO) CEO Anthony Ambrose on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Data I/O Corporation's (DAIO) CEO Anthony Ambrose on Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptMay. 7.17 | About: Data I/O (DAIO) Data I/O Corporation (NASDAQ:DAIO)
Q1 2017 Results Conference Call
May 04, 2017 05:00 PM ET
Executives
Jordan Darrow - Darrow Associates
Anthony Ambrose - President and CEO
Joel Hatlen - VP, Finance and CFO
Analysts
Robert Anderson - Penbrook
Adam Hutt - L-Partners
David Kanen - Kanen Wealth Management
Art Winston - Pilot Advisors
Clark Lehman - Logos Partners
Operator
Ladies and gentlemen, thank you for standing by and welcome to the Data I/O First Quarter 2017 Conference Call. At this time, all lines are in a listen-only mode. Later there will be an opportunity for your questions and instructions will be given at that time. [Operator Instructions] And as a reminder, this conference is being recorded.
I'll now turn the conference over to Jordan Darrow of Darrow Associates. Please go ahead, sir.
Jordan Darrow
Thank you, and welcome to the Data I/O Corporation first quarter 2017 financial results conference call. With me today are Anthony Ambrose President and CEO of Data I/O Corporation and Joel Hatlen, Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Data I/O.
Before we begin, I'd like to remind you that statements made in this conference call concerning future revenues, results from operations, financial position, economic conditions, product releases, and any other statements that may be construed as a prediction of future performance or events are forward- looking statements which involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors, which may cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied by such statements.
These factors include uncertainties as to the levels of orders, ability to record revenues based upon the timing of product deliveries and installations, market acceptance of new products, changes in economic conditions, end market demand, pricing and other activities by competitors and other risks including those described from time-to-time in the company's filings on Forms 10-K and 10-Q with the Securities and Exchange Commission, press releases, and other communications.
The accuracies and completeness of forward-looking statements should not be unduly relied upon. Data I/O is under no duty to update any of these forward-looking statements.
I would now like to turn the call over to Anthony Ambrose, President and CEO of Data I/O.
Anthony Ambrose
Thank you very much Jordan. I'd like to comment a little bit on 2017's first quarter results and our outlook on the overall market, and then, I'll turn it over to Joel for some more detail on the numbers.
In Q1, we hit on all cylinders as a company. Bookings were extremely strong and we delivered $7.2 million of revenue. System shipped and adapter shipped were all up, and our operations team has increased automated systems capacity about 40% since Q1 of last year to support our customer's ramp and maintain on-time delivery performance and quality. We will continue to increase capacity per systems in Q2 through improved efficiency, optimize capacity planning, and relentless focus. On last quarter's conference call, I reviewed our company's strategic imperatives for 2017. We've largely completed our turnaround and are now focused on the growth opportunities in automotive and secured Internet of Things.
Our first imperative was to grow revenue and seize the new market opportunities in our core business. As we discussed in the final release, we had growth in all major product lines and key international geographic markets. This is consistent with the doubling of the available market by 2020 that we forecasted in early 2016.
We showed how this was driven by automotive electronics, the Internet of Things, and factory automation. Our strong growth in market share in automotive electronics reinforce our belief that we're in the wave of a new and exciting electronic content, including automotive infotainment and instrument cluster applications, advanced driver assist systems, increased use of electric hybrid engines and powertrains, and generally more systems to support autonomous driving strategies from leading automotive OEMs.

The strong performance in Q1 was driven largely by our PSV family of programming systems featuring the LumenX programming and FlashCORE III programming technology, which are setting new standards in technological innovation.
Imperative number two is to enhance and extend our platforms in programming technologies. We have significantly increased our R&D spending to support our current products and to develop the SentriX Security Programming Technology, recently demonstrated at the Embedded World event in Germany last March.
The increase of $420,000 in R&D year over year includes hiring several engineers and other development expenses and variable costs in engineering. Our new ConneX smart programming software, which was announced in Q1 is integrated with our high growth PSV systems. This technology addresses the heightening demand for extensive traceability, process monitoring and predictive analytics, particularly within the automotive electronics market.
As we previously discussed, we're now seeing demand and requirements for a much more secure Internet of Things. A new generation of security solutions within authentication devices, other secure elements and secure microcontrollers are expected to gain share over the next several years. These trends in silicon technology and OEM demands create a new opportunity in Managed and Secure Programming and we're investing to lead the industry in a potential market of 4 billion units in 2021, according to ABI Research and company estimates.
As the global leader in firmware provisioning, we're partnering with the leading suppliers of secure elements and secure microcontrollers as well as industry security experts to develop high volume, cost effective security provisioning solutions.
In Q1, we announced key partnerships with Renesas, Infineon, EBV Avnet and Renaissance Infineon EBV Avnet and Secure Thingz. In this growing market, we view the next 12 months as largely a market development phase to establish our key design wins and relationships with meaningful revenue to follow from there.
Our next imperative was to market and sell our products globally. As the transition from manual to automated manufacturing processes continues worldwide, we appear to be gaining market share in all of our markets. Our installed base continues to show good growth and also drives increasing consumable sales as our adapter business in Q1 was very strong with revenues of about $1.6 million. Our current sales funnel is strong, driven by the automotive market and programming centers.
Finally, I'd like to remind all of our shareholders that the Annual Meeting will be held May 18, 2017 at 10:00 in the morning here Data I/O. We invite all of our shareholders in the area to attend.
I'd like to turn the call over now to Joel Hatlen, our CFO, for a more detailed review of our numbers. Joel?
Joel Hatlen
Thank you, Anthony. Good day to everyone. Net sales in the first quarter of 2017 were $7.2 million compared with $4.6 million in the first quarter of 2016. As Anthony noted, automotive electronics and the Internet of Things demand from both OEMs and programming centers drove increased revenues primarily related to our PSV family of automated programming systems.
Revenues from adapters and consumable were up 43%. Revenue composition for the quarter was approximately 70% from equipment, 22% from consumables and 8% from software and services. International sales represented approximately 90% of total sales for the first quarter and compared to 78% in 2016 first quarter. And regionally, had the strongest growth in Europe.
Order bookings were $8.4 million in the first quarter of 2017, a 17 year high compared to $7.4 million in the fourth quarter of 2016 or a sequential growth of 14% and from $5.9 million in the first quarter of last year for a year over year growth of 42%. The variation in revenue percentages versus order percentages relate to the change in deferred revenues and currency translation.

Backlog at the end of the quarter was 4.9 million on March 31, 2017 compared to 3.2 million at the end of the fourth quarter of 2016, and 2 million at the end of the first quarter of 2016. Deferred revenue at the end of the first quarter was 1.4 million compared to 1.9 million at December 31, 2016.
For the first quarter of 2017, gross margin as a percentage of sales was 57.7% compared to 54.8% in the first quarter of 2016 and 56.3% in the fourth quarter of 2016. The increase was primarily due to favorable factory variances, sales volumes which resulted in better fixed factory cost utilization and a favorable product mix.
Operating expenses were 3.4 million in the first quarter of 2017 compared to 2.7 million in the same period of 2016. The increase was primarily due to additional engineering, incentive, consultant, and commission and compensation, as well as costs associated with new hires in large part associated with our new Managed and Secure Programming platform.
Looking forward, the higher level of R&D expense incurred during the first quarter will continue in 2017 as we prepare for revenue generation for this newer platform in 2018. However, our growths from the current business lines has more than offset the increased spending on next generation development.
In accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, GAAP, net income in the first quarter of 2017 was 979,000 or $0.12 per diluted share compared with a net loss of 168,000 or $0.02 per diluted share in the first quarter of 2016. Included in non-operating income were gains of 211,000 from sales of non-core Internet domain assets.
EBITDA, earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization was 1.1 million in the first quarter of 2017 compared to an EBITDA loss 51,000 in the first quarter of 2016. Equity compensation, a non-cash item in the first quarter of 2017 and 2016 were 97,000 and 95,000 respectively.
Adjusted EBITDA, excluding equity compensation was 1.2 million in the first quarter of 2017 compared to 44,000 in the first quarter of 2016. Please see our press release for a discussion and reconciliation of these non-GAAP financial measures. We have net operating loss NOL carryforwards of approximately 18 million as well as other credit carryforwards in the U.S. that are available to continue to offset our future U.S. net income and we will continue to analyze and manage taxes to take advantage of these tax attributes.
During the first quarter of 2017, no shares were purchased under the company's share repurchase program, which expired on March 31, 2017. Overall, a total of 80,345 shares were purchased at an average price of $2.38 under the program. The company's cash position at March 31, 2017 was $10.5 million with approximately $5.2 million in the United States and the balance in foreign subsidiaries. Working capital increased to $15.5 million at the end of the first quarter from $14.6 million at the beginning of the year. The company remains debt free and had 8,049,000 shares outstanding at March 31, 2017.
At this point, I'll turn the discussion back to Anthony.
Anthony Ambrose
Thank you very much, Joel. At this point, I'd like to turn the call over to Jordan and our moderator so we can entertain questions from the call. Jordan?
Jordan Darrow
Okay. Thank you. Operator, would you please introduce the Q&A process and then take callers as they come in.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator 
[Operator Instructions] And our first question will come from Robert Anderson with Penbrook. Go ahead please.
Robert Anderson
My question relates to the increased R&D spending and the reference in your talk about research for a next generation of products. Maybe you could say a little more about the next generation of products which I guess have security features?

Anthony Ambrose
Correct. We're focused on the products we demonstrated and announced in Q1, our SentriX platform, and we demonstrated these at the Embedded World Trade Show event in Nuremberg, Germany in mid-March. What SentriX does is it allows customers to secure their Internet of Things devices, which allows them to secure their supply chain and also maintain firmware integrity on their IoT devices over the life cycle of the product.
When you boil it all down, this means things like the hacks you read about in the newspaper, people using Internet of Things devices to get into people's Gmail accounts or hacking their services or finding out their passwords and credentials, all that can be stopped because the OEMs that build IoT devices now have a way to make sure that they can control that firmware update process in a very secure manner, starting from when the device is born in the manufacturing process, and that's where we come in with SentriX. 
What we demonstrated was a SentriX working on the Infineon OPTIGA Trust E, which is an authentication IC, and also, we announced our partnership with Renesas on the secure microcontroller products family they have just announced, which is called the Synergy product family and we're very excited about that because Renesas is a global leader in microcontrollers and Infineon is a global leader in authentication ICs.
So, a good chunk of the R&D went into the SentriX platform. We also have R&D initiatives to enhance and extend the LumenX programmer, continued releases there; continued feature enhancements on the PSV7000 and 5000, usually targeting our automotive and programming center and industrial customers. So that's where the spending is going.
Robert Anderson
Is it fair to say then that this new technology will appeal, obviously, to the automotive customers, but it will gradually spread to many sectors of the semiconductor industry?
Anthony Ambrose
Absolutely, Bob. The security is becoming a requirement, not just in automotive, although the automotive market is very keen on it. But just in the general Internet of Things market, when you look at where Internet of Things devices are going, they simply have to be secured and OEM customers are looking for a simple, easy way to do that that doesn't require them to vastly change how they build their products and vastly change their factories, and that's where we think SentriX can really help them out.
Operator
Our next question will come from Adam Hutt with L-Partners. Go ahead please.
Adam Hutt
I was with Leviticus Partners, of course you might remember me. So, as you look at the market now for the security authentication product now for the IoT market, looking out several years, very long-term, as you know, we are long-term investors. How big can it be?
Anthony Ambrose
Well, we rely on a lot of the market forecasts. We use ABI and we've included that in some of our materials to show. It's about a 4-billion-unit total available market in a 24-billion-unit microcontroller total available market by about 2021. So, we're excited about that because that represents a significant upside in our total available market compared to where we are today. So, that's probably the best market we have out in the future. And within that, more specifically, we're trying to find and work with the industry leaders on their specific product lines.
The microcontroller market is fairly, heavily segmented. Market leaders have about 18% share and so our goal is to work with the industry leaders to support their newest generations of products. And so, as they mature, we'll mature with them and grow with them.
Adam Hutt
But to do the margin math on I mean, back in the day, Fred Hume used to talk about getting anywhere from $0.25 to maybe $0.80 per unit and prevent Cisco counterfeit boxes from going to the army and stuff like that. So what are we talking about there? Are you guys looking to get several pennies for every IoT device and how many devices do you think it's possible that you could be in, in 2021?

Anthony Ambrose
Yes, Adam, I think at this point, given that we have a lot of competitors always on our call, I'd just like to leave it that we're going after the 4-billion-unit market and we can serve it profitably. And as we get closer, we'll have more to say on that.
Adam Hutt
Okay, thank you guys. Good luck.
Operator
Our next question will come from David Kanen with Kanen Wealth Management. Go ahead please.
David Kanen
First question is, these new products are clearly incremental, implicitly, one could have come to the conclusion that they're replacing our core business, but the managed security initiative is purely incremental to our core business. Is that correct?
Anthony Ambrose
That's correct, Dave.
David Kanen
Okay. So you use the term, you said you're announcing some partnerships, Renesas and I forgot what the other one was. But you expect, "meaningful revenue" from there. How would you define meaningful? Not to belabor the point, but does this incremental opportunity have the potential to be the same size as your core business?
Anthony Ambrose
We haven't gone into that level of detail, Dave and I think the key point I was trying to make here was that, in 2017, the focus for us this year is on developing the technology and developing the relationships. It's not a revenue generation year. We haven't given out a revenue forecast on what this can do. I just want to point out that, again, we're looking at about a 4-billion-unit market and we're trying to work with the market leaders in there.
David Kanen
Okay. Is this something in 2018 that will be incremental?
Anthony Ambrose
Yes, I think you'll start to see it in 2018. As we get closer to 2018, I'll have more specific information. I guess my message is, it's not incremental material revenue in 2017. That's clear.
David Kanen
Okay. And then, my other question is in regard to your ConneX software, if I'm pronouncing it correctly, traceability and factory automation integration. I know you had some software components to your existing automated systems, how much of this is incremental? And then, if you can give us a sense as to the margin impact on this going forward?
Anthony Ambrose
So, I think the way to look at ConneX is we believe that this is something that's going to be necessary as customers move towards a more complete factory automation and smart factory initiative. And you can look at a number of industry players, the people that build the SMT lines, the leading suppliers there all have initiatives to bring together the various pieces of an SMT line into a way that's much easier to manage and much easier to control centrally from the customer's MES or Manufacturing and Equipment Systems. 
So, we intend to support that. We have had the FIS or Factory Integration Software on our Roadrunner products for years. This makes it much easier to integrate across various programmers and handlers in a unified and simplified manner. To cut right to the chase, technically the output is XML, which means that you and I could even code something in about half an hour with XML and it makes it a lot easier to present that interface to a variety of different customer systems and allow them to integrate it without having us to spend a lot of time helping them. So that's the significance of ConneX. It's mildly incremental, I guess I characterize it that way. But we think it also gives our systems a compelling advantage for customers that want to go into that factory automation space.
Joel Hatlen
And really, it's a core building block for the whole security offering.
Anthony Ambrose
Exactly.
David Kanen
Then, I'm going to ask one more quick question and then I'll go back into queue. Just the cadence or seasonality typically as we work through the year, can you just comment on that?

Anthony Ambrose
Well, I think Dave, the seasonality that -- we normally would have expected business to soften between Thanksgiving and Chinese New Year. That did not happen this year. We blew right through that. When you look at the Q4 numbers I talked about how strong December was, we had strength right from the beginning of the year in Q1 and it's continued. So this year is, it's not following a typical seasonal pattern in the sense that Thanksgiving to Chinese New Year period turned out to be quite strong.
David Kanen
So typically, what are your strongest quarters?
Anthony Ambrose
Typically, it would be Q2 and Q3.
David Kanen
Okay. Good luck. Thanks guys, won't see in Seattle, too far.
Operator
We'll go next to [indiscernible] with Magnolia Capital. Go ahead please.
Unidentified Analyst
Wanted to ask just a couple of questions around your Managed and Secure platform. And the first was, just thinking about R&D spending or investment there, can you elaborate a little, maybe help us think about what percentage of R&D is going into that new platform and whether you're doing that internally or are you outsourcing portions of that software engineering to other parties?
Anthony Ambrose
Matt, we haven't broken out the specific percentages that are going into Manage and Secure Programing and I probably won't do that for competitive reasons. But the key point I'd like to make is, most of it's internal. We do make use of consultants and external resources from time to time in R&D to help us solve specific problems. But when we have a core capability, we try and get it done internally and so most of our R&D spend is internal.
Unidentified Analyst
And then, in terms of that platform, you discussed earlier that this is mainly a 2018 revenue contributor, but can you address maybe kind of market size and how to think about early growth in that platform and maybe a little about the competition and how you stack up your competitive advantages against those competitors as you bring this out?
Anthony Ambrose
Sure. The process today to get a device secured requires you to get it done with the semiconductor manufacturer at the wafer level. And that works well if you're a really big company or if you have a very predictable demand cycle and if you exceed their minimum order quantity and minimum lead times. What we found is, there is a significant piece of the market that is not servable by that current model. And the semiconductor companies themselves are very excited about working with us because they think they can grow their market for these personalization capabilities that already exist in their silicon.
So, we're helping them go after a market that we all believe can be profitably served, but is not being served today, and so, our competitive advantage is, we have a great platform, we have the ability to work within the industry structure as it exists today, so people don't need to tear up all their factories or all their business processes to implement this. And at the same time, the semiconductor companies like it because it expands their markets. Additionally, we've got a number of our patents filed and in the approval process. So, our strategy is to have the best product, be the best supplier, be protected from an IP standpoint and a know-how standpoint.
Operator
Our next question is from Art Winston with Pilot Advisors. Go ahead please.
Art Winston
In terms of the European business, I assume it came from the four or five major automotive OEM manufacturers in Europe?
Anthony Ambrose
European business, Art, is primarily automotive and automotive programming centers. So yes, the vast majority of the business comes from the automotive segment in Europe.
Art Winston
And but it's not necessarily from the OEMs that manufacture themselves?

Anthony Ambrose
No, think of the supply chain goes through people like the leading automotive electronics companies and then they would sell to the nameplates.
Art Winston
Understood. Is there any reason to believe that given the really preponderance of the increase in automotive electronics, so basically this business is just going to keep going and going at the rate it is particularly in Europe, the automotive part?
Anthony Ambrose
Yes Art, that's a really good point, and I think I've been talking about, and I think I've been talking about automotive on these calls for at least a couple of years. The fundamental long term trends in automotive are pretty visible. If you go out and look what everyone is saying around infotainment platforms, around advanced driver assist systems, either for safety or ultimately for autonomous driving, and the rapid emergence of hybrid vehicles and electric vehicles. 
The nice thing about a hybrid is they have to build an electrical engine and powertrain and a gasoline engine and powertrain. And I think with the demise of diesel, you're seeing more and more pressure to move more quickly to electric and hybrid. And then finally, mobility and autonomous driving also drive electric content in cars. This is a multiyear trend Art, it's nowhere near finished. I can point you to a number of third party studies or publicly available information that looks at penetration rates in western markets and then penetration rates in emerging markets, the various content and semiconductor content per vehicle. A lot of the big brokerage firms have pretty good materials on this. We certainly don't have anything better from a research perspective. But I would encourage you to look at that and all of them basically say we've got plenty of room to go in automotive because these trends are accelerating, not decelerating.
Arthur Winston
My next question isn't that important, but I want to ask it anyway. It seems like the preponderance of your profits now are coming out of Europe and you really don't pay any taxes, and I'm wondering, well your tax loss carryforwards really won't be worth that much because you'll have to pay taxes from all this European business that you're doing?
Anthony Ambrose
Well, I just want to, for the record, say we do pay our taxes, we pay them on time and all the taxing jurisdictions that are familiar with us make sure that that's the case. The goal is to be smart for the business and then, be smart for the taxation strategy and Joel does a good job on that. I don't know, Joel do you want to have any other specific comments? I don't want to get into.
Joel Hatlen
Yes. No, Art the big thing is that we've managed our business to have the IP and the manufacturing profits in China and the United States where we have some really good tax attribute things to deal with. And so the only part that really gets taxed in Europe is the distribution related profits there. So, from that standpoint, we've been able to really manage to achieve a much lower tax rate on our European business than we have at other places, so otherwise yes.
Arthur Winston
Excellent. I've one last question, is there anything that's not going right here in May of 2017?
Anthony Ambrose
Art, there are lot of things that aren't going perfectly and our job is to make that list of things that aren't going perfectly smaller and smaller every day.
Operator 
[Operator Instructions] We do have a follow up from Robert Andersen with Penbrook. Go ahead please.
Robert Anderson
Joel, obviously, you discussed this, but there was a big jump in total operating expenses from 2.7 to 3.36. So my question is, I presume this higher level of operating expenses will pertain for the balance of the year or will it even go higher than the 3.36?

Joel Hatlen
Yes, it's a variable item. So the answer is really that of the $600 and some thousand increase in spending, there is about 400 to 480 that is what I call variable cost that are based on the level of our business that's happening and how many are independent variable cost like consultants and things like that are taking place. And the rest of that is headcount type additions in R&D really.
Operator
And we also have a follow-up from Art Winston with Pilot Advisors. Go ahead please.
Art Winston
In studying the proxy statement for the annual meeting later this month, it would seem like management doesn't own enough stock in relation to what it seems to be an exceptional job that is done and if there is any way that shareholders or even the managers can influence the board to make more stock available to the management, it will work out well and it's well deserved. So that's, I guess not a question, it's an observation or a comment.
Operator
And we now have a question from Clark Lehman with Logos Partners. Go ahead please.
Clark Lehman
Hi, gentlemen. I got to apologize, I'm not familiar with your company, but the numbers intrigued me. I can understand your renaissance you're talking about, the market size and customers. Can you educate me as to which competitors' you guys are most concerned about? I don't know any of your competitors.
Anthony Ambrose
Yes, what I'd encourage you to do is we do a pretty detailed job of describing that in the 10-K and we just updated that, so that's extremely current. I would encourage you to walk through that. And if you have any questions, give Joel and I a call, we can clarify anything offline.
Clark Lehman
So, that's the he who must not be named answer. Okay, I will do that.
Operator
Thank you. We have no one else in queue, gentlemen. Please go ahead with any closing remarks.
Anthony Ambrose
Okay, thank you very much. At this point, I'd like to close the Q1 2017 earnings call and thank everyone for participating. And at this point, we are closed. Thank you.
Operator
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen, that does conclude our conference for today. Thank you for your participation and for using AT&T Executive Teleconference. You may now disconnect.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Technology, Scientific & Technical Instruments, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All DAIO TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector





Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksApple Is Overvalued, Buy It Anyway?AAPL• Today, 1:26 AM • PendragonYRedfin IPO, Tech Company Changing Real Estate IndustryRDFN• Today, 12:42 AM • Don Dion•1 CommentWhat AT&T's Q2 Results Tell Us About The Dividend SafetyT• Today, 12:10 AM • Jonathan Weber•9 CommentsWhat Will Apple Build In Those '3 Big, Beautiful Plants'?AAPL• Yesterday, 11:34 PM • Mark Hibben•13 CommentsAT&T: Grand SlamT• Yesterday, 6:54 PM • Quad 7 Capital•31 CommentsSeparating The Noise From (Encouraging) Fundamentals During Tech Sector VolatilityXLK, VGT, TECL• Yesterday, 6:30 PM • Janus Henderson Investors•1 CommentAT&T: Does A Surprise Beat Alter The Thesis?T• Yesterday, 6:21 PM • Stone Fox Capital•29 CommentsElectronic Arts: What To Watch For With EarningsEA• Yesterday, 6:18 PM • Roman Luzgin•3 CommentsTears For Sears (And Other Amazon Competitors)AMZN• Yesterday, 6:09 PM • David Pinsen•26 CommentsAdvanced Micro Devices, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAMD• Yesterday, 6:02 PM • SA Transcripts•35 CommentsAT&T Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesT• Yesterday, 6:01 PM • SA Transcripts•3 CommentsIPG Photonics' Laser Technology - Mark Hibben's Idea Of The MonthEditors' Pick • IPGP• Yesterday, 4:23 PM • Mark Hibben•2 Comments4% Dividend Yield From IBM: International Business Machinations?IBM• Yesterday, 3:27 PM • Beulah Meriam K•6 CommentsNvidia: Earnings PredictionNVDA• Yesterday, 3:08 PM • Earnings Forecast Focus•9 CommentsNordic Semiconductor's Renewed Growth Has Melted Some Of The SkepticismEditors' Pick • NDCVF• Yesterday, 3:07 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFA•1 CommentExclusive Teardown Confirms New Samsung SupplierSSNLF• Yesterday, 2:58 PM • Lou Basenese•16 CommentsPaypal: Pure Play On E-Commerce TransitionPYPL• Yesterday, 2:58 PM • L&F Capital Management•2 CommentsAlphabet Falls After Earnings: Buying OpportunityGOOG, GOOGL• Yesterday, 2:12 PM • Andres Cardenal, CFA•10 CommentsAlphabet - Solid Execution Continues, Buy On Further DipsGOOG, GOOGL• Yesterday, 1:55 PM • The Value Investor•3 CommentsAdvanced Micro Devices' Earnings Come Out Today After Market CloseAMD• Yesterday, 1:42 PM • JJ Kinahan•60 CommentsSocial Network Facebook Gears Up To Report Q2 Earnings With Its Stock At New HighsFB• Yesterday, 1:26 PM • JJ Kinahan•8 CommentsHP's Bold Acquisition Could Be A Positive For StockholdersHPQ• Yesterday, 12:55 PM • Russell Naisbitt•10 CommentsHere's How Blue Apron Could SucceedAPRN• Yesterday, 12:54 PM • Mike Berner•5 CommentsTaking Stock With Tech: Alphabet Sinks, Can AMD Float?AMD, GOOG, GOOGL• Yesterday, 12:34 PM • Alex Cho•27 CommentsMicrochip Technologies: High Risk, Low RewardMCHP• Yesterday, 11:57 AM • John DiCecco•4 CommentsCisco Is A Gamble That Might Pay OffCSCO• Yesterday, 11:37 AM • Liu Jiao•13 CommentsApple Supplier Bets Big On U.S. - A Rangeley Capital DiscussionEditors' Pick • AAPL• Yesterday, 11:28 AM • Chris DeMuth Jr.•5 CommentsBrokerage Or Tech Firm? Redfin's Valuation Requires The LatterRDFN• Yesterday, 11:07 AM • David Trainer•2 CommentsAlphabet Q2: Price Target Lowered To $1,050GOOG, GOOGL• Yesterday, 10:54 AM • SIC Investment Research Inc.•2 CommentsRedfin IPO: Tech Company, Real Estate Brokerage, or Something New?RDFN• Yesterday, 9:41 AM • Fish and TipsLogitech International S.A. 2018 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLOGI• Yesterday, 9:19 AM • SA Transcripts•7 CommentsAMD: Brace YourselfAMD• Yesterday, 9:06 AM • Kumquat Research•93 CommentsBlue Apron: Quiet Period Ends. Prepare To Sell The Bounce.APRN• Yesterday, 8:14 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•18 CommentsIs Facebook Exaggerating User Growth And Is That A Threat To Its Valuation?FB• Yesterday, 8:00 AM • NYC Trader•49 CommentsWhat's Driving Alphabet's Stock Price Weakness?GOOG, GOOGL• Yesterday, 7:00 AM • D.M. Martins Research•21 CommentsWhy 'Dunkirk's' Success Means Much More To AT&T Than Investors May ThinkT• Yesterday, 5:57 AM • The Entertainment Oracle•10 CommentsAmazon - The Many Thematic Tailwinds Pushing It ForwardAMZN• Yesterday, 5:53 AM • Tematica Research•11 CommentsTableau Needs To Move Beyond Data VisualizationDATA• Yesterday, 5:16 AM • Prasanna Rajagopal•6 CommentsKnowles Corporation: A Solid Investment IdeaKN• Yesterday, 1:45 AM • The Knife Catcher•10 CommentsMomo 8.0: The Unavoidable ChangeMOMO• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:39 PM • Ang Shen•5 CommentsA Critical Day For AT&TT• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:23 PM • Quad 7 Capital•34 CommentsSamsung Wants A Piece Of TSMCSSNLF, TSM• Mon, Jul. 24, 10:36 PM • Mark Hibben•11 CommentsSiemens Is Cheap And Healthineers Helps To Unlock The ValueSIEGY• Mon, Jul. 24, 10:24 PM • Wubbe Bos•6 CommentsSnap: The Next Twitter?SNAP• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:58 PM • Activist Stocks•68 CommentsAlphabet: Ignore The One-Time ChargesGOOG, GOOGL• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:46 PM • Stone Fox Capital•26 CommentsBaidu: Strong Upside, A Short-Term Trigger And A Bright FutureBIDU• Mon, Jul. 24, 8:09 PM • Value Investigator•13 CommentsWhy You Should Sell Your Apple Shares Before The Next iPhone ReleaseAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:42 PM • Michael A. Ball•123 CommentsFirst Solar - Q2 Earnings PreviewFSLR• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:17 PM • Morningsidepark•22 CommentsLook Beyond The Storm Clouds Hovering Over Silicon MotionEditors' Pick • SIMO• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:14 PM • Jenks Jumps•7 CommentsRambus, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRMBS• Mon, Jul. 24, 7:01 PM • SA TranscriptsGroupon Should Still Have A Place In Your Long-Term PortfolioGRPN• Mon, Jul. 24, 6:45 PM • Julie Kent•7 CommentsApple iPhone 8 Expectations Trending Lower Ahead Of EarningsAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:45 PM • Alex Cho•50 CommentsPositioning For Verizon EarningsVZ• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:43 PM • Josh Arnold•20 CommentsMicrosoft: Shareholders Are Set To Benefit From This StockMSFT• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:27 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•14 CommentsSanmina Corp 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSANM• Mon, Jul. 24, 5:03 PM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentArtificial Intelligence: The New Impulse For AlphabetGOOG, GOOGL• Mon, Jul. 24, 4:34 PM • Oleh Kombaiev•17 CommentsApple Is Likely To Switch To In-House ScreensAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 4:16 PM • Roman Luzgin•22 CommentsBaozun: Is There More Upside In This 2017 Runner?BZUN• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:47 PM • Jonathan Faison•36 CommentsFacebook Earnings Preview: Bullish On InstagramFB• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:36 PM • L&F Capital Management•19 CommentsAMD: King Of The CrossoverAMD• Mon, Jul. 24, 2:59 PM • Kumquat Research•80 CommentsWhy Amazon Needs To Improve Its B2B E-Commerce PresenceAMZN• Mon, Jul. 24, 2:18 PM • Motek Moyen•16 Comments3 Reasons Why Facebook Could Disappoint This QuarterFB• Mon, Jul. 24, 2:08 PM • D.M. Martins Research•31 CommentsAMD's Post-Earnings Target PricesAMD• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:52 PM • Kwan-Chen Ma•237 CommentsMicrosoft's Office 365 Is The New WindowsMSFT• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:19 PM • Beulah Meriam K•17 CommentsKeeping Stock With Tech: FANG Earnings Kicks Off This Week, With Google And FacebookFB, GOOG, GOOGL• Mon, Jul. 24, 12:37 PM • Alex Cho•19 CommentsQualcomm Is Dead MoneyQCOM• Mon, Jul. 24, 12:33 PM • Kumquat Research•57 CommentsLighten Your Load Ahead Of Twitter EarningsTWTR• Mon, Jul. 24, 12:12 PM • Amigobulls•13 CommentsAmazon Web Services To Experience A Downturn?AMZN• Mon, Jul. 24, 12:09 PM • SIC Investment Research Inc.•19 CommentsAlphabet Earnings Preview: Google Parent Reports Q2 Results TodayGOOG, GOOGL• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:59 AM • JJ Kinahan•1 CommentIt's Not All Gloom And Doom For QualcommQCOM• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:49 AM • Amigobulls•7 CommentsIs AT&T The Best Income Opportunity Available Today?T• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:34 AM • Left Banker•32 CommentsSkyworks: Post-Earnings Valuation Reveals Solid Upside PotentialSWKS• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:34 AM • Roman Luzgin•3 CommentsApple: Services Revenue Growth Suggests Higher Dividend IncreaseAAPL• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:30 AM • Ploutos Investing•10 CommentsIBM: This Blue-Chip Stock Just Went On SaleIBM• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:27 AM • Robert Riesen•30 CommentsMonopoly Scrutiny Of Amazon BaselessAMZN• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:23 AM • Gary Bourgeault•22 Comments123456...1161Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Total System Services' (TSS) CEO Troy Woods on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TSS•
      Wed, Jul. 26, 12:02 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Canadian National Railway's (CNI) CEO Luc Jobin on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CNI•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:58 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




W.R. Berkley's (WRB) CEO Robert Berkley on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WRB•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:54 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Smart & Final Stores' (SFS) CEO David Hirz on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SFS•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




FCB Financial Holdings' (FCB) CEO Kent Ellert on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FCB•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




EXACT Sciences' (EXAS) CEO Kevin Conroy on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EXAS•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:26 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




DXP Enterprises' (DXPE) CEO David Little on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DXPE•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:16 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Houlihan Lokey's (HLI) CEO Scott Beiser on Q1 2018 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HLI•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Zions Bancorp's (ZION) CEO Harris Simmons on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ZION•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:10 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Amgen (AMGN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AMGN•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Advanced Micro Devices (AMD) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AMD•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 11:03 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•14 Comments 



Fibria Celulose's (FBR) CEO Marcelo Castelli on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FBR•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:56 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Robert Half International's (RHI) CEO Harold Messmer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RHI•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Chegg's (CHGG) CEO Daniel Rosensweig on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CHGG•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Carlisle Companies' (CSL) CEO Chris Koch on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CSL•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:23 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Akamai Technologies' (AKAM) CEO Tom Leighton on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AKAM•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:20 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Wynn Resorts (WYNN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WYNN•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Aspen's (ASPU) CEO Michael Mathews on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ASPU•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:18 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Rocky Brands' (RCKY) CEO Jason Brooks on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RCKY•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:13 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Moelis & Co's (MC) CEO Kenneth Moelis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MC•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:08 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Invuity's (IVTY) CEO Philip Sawyer on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


IVTY•
      Tue, Jul. 25, 10:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Dolby Laboratories' (DLB) CEO Kevin Yeaman on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DLB•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Juniper Networks (JNPR) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


JNPR•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:39 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Celestica's (CLS) CEO Rob Mionis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CLS•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:30 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Enterprise Financial Services' (EFSC) CEO Jim Lally on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EFSC•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Compagnie Generale des Etablissements Michelin's (MGDDF) CEO Jean-Dominique Senard on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MGDDF•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:07 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Texas Instruments (TXN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TXN•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Chipotle Mexican Grill (CMG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CMG•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  9:01 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



AT&T (T) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


T•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  8:47 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•3 Comments 



Hawaiian Holdings' (HA) CEO Mark Dunkerley on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HA•
      Tue, Jul. 25,  8:34 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4436Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 


Ambrose-Anthony Ltd., Publishing Services















Ambrose-Anthony, Ltd.




Publishing Services












		Ambrose-Anthony
		





		Who are we?
		





		What dowe do?
		





		Submit aManuscript
		





		ProductionRates
		







		Author'sBiographies
		





		Mission &Theology
		





		EpiscopalResources
		





		A Tripto Europe
		





tvod.com








Introduction

Ambrose-Anthony, Ltd. is a publishing house that produces a balanced theological spectrum of Episcopal thought, and directly markets the resulting books to clergy and parishioners.


This site generates no billable revenue but is a promotional outlet for the publisher. No advertising is present. Many clients are clergy of the Episcopal Church. The target audience is an Episcopal deacon, priest or bishop of any age or gender. Probably not the most computer savvy, but one who sees the value in it and needs advice and guidance.



"Episcopal thought, explained."


This is a new and comprehensive grouping of services designed to evangelize ("get the word out"). As a one source shopping for services, a writer (generally a priest or bishop) can begin with a simple idea for a book and have it brought to fruition. At least four manuscript submissions, primarily new, and from Episcopal clergy, will be accepted each quarter.


As the most recent editor of the 2001 Episcopal Clerical Directory, the publisher has contact information for all 17,000 clerics, including almost 10,000 e-mail addresses. Although a new company and site, the target audience knows of his work with the Episcopal Church as editor and writer. 


"Illuminating the Divine"


On the following pages, one may search for information, find rates, submit manuscripts, call for more information, etc.


This project was originally begun for "Principles and Applications of Publishing on the Internet (Y59.1360 Section 1)" at New York University. Last modified: August 12, 2002





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 






Ambrose Anthony Found! | Check For Arrests, Warrants 










































 


 





 Ambrose Anthony Found!!  Check For Arrests, Warrants 
    Show Me Ambrose's Records 





 Please take into consideration that Ambrose Anthony's records can only be used for personal reasons. For example locating old friends and family or verifying if a person has criminal history and if they can be trusted, to name a few.

You cannot use these records for consumer credit, tenant screening, employment, insurance qualifications or anything else that may be subjected to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq.
Ambrose Anthony's records do not contain credit scores and reports. We and our partners are not a consumer reporting agency.
Click here to continue.
 





 Discover Everything You Ever Wanted to Know About Ambrose Anthony 


 

Arrest Records, Warrants, DWI and MugshotsIf Ambrose’s ever had a run-in with the law then his records will show where, when and why.


Addresses, Phone and EmailAmbrose’s record will show current and past mailing addresses, phone numbers and any email addresses he’s had.


Marriage, Divorce and Birth RecordsImportant events from Ambrose’s life have been compiled from state and local county.

  

Sex Offender RegistryFind out instantly if Ambrose is registered as a sex offender and if he is a threat.


Hidden Online ProfilesFind out all of Ambrose’s online social media profiles and any hidden ones you’re not supposed to know about.


Assets, Businesses and LicensesFind out if Ambrose is hiding any assets, owns any businesses and what licenses they are registered for.

  Show Me Ambrose's Records 


 Instant Access Anywhere and Anytime 


 

100% Anonymous and Instant
In a few minutes from now you'll get full access to Ambrose's background in the comforts of home.
Ambrose will not know you are looking up their background and pulling records.
With state of the art connection your search is also secure from prying eyes.


 


 Look Up Anyone You Want 



 Get Ambrose's Records + Unlimited Searches
In addition to getting a full background on Ambrose Anthony, which includes contact info, arrest records, assets, bankruptcies and more, you'll also get full access to our database 24/7.
Look up anyone else you want so long as they reside in the United States of America.
Whether it's celebrities, family members or friends you're not restricted on your search.
  Get Me Ambrose's Records and Unlimited Searches on Anyone I Want 
     




Copyright 2016 - 911arrests.com - All Rights Reserved 



























